Maryland, session 2026, HB1636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–306.
(a) (1) In this section[, “restorative] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1636*

HOUSE BILL 1636
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) (I) “RESTORATIVE practices” means a communally and culturally
responsive, relationship–focused student discipline model that:
[(i)] 1. Is preventive and proactive;
[(ii)] 2. Emphasizes building strong relationships and setting
clear behavioral expectations that contribute to the well–being of the school community;
[(iii)] 3. In response to behavior that violates the clear behavioral
expectations that contribute to the well–being of the school community, focuses on
accountability for any harm done by the problem behavior; and
[(iv)] 4. Addresses ways to repair the relationships affected by the
problem behavior with the voluntary participation of an individual who was harmed.
[(2)] (II) “Restorative practices” may include:
[(i)] 1. Conflict resolution;
[(ii)] 2. Mediation;
[(iii)] 3. Peer mediation;
[(iv)] 4. Circle processes;
[(v)] 5. Restorative conferences;
[(vi)] 6. Social emotional learning;
[(vii)] 7. Trauma–informed care;
[(viii)] 8. Positive behavioral intervention supports; and
[(ix)] 9. Personal accountability.
(3) “SUBGROUP” MEANS A GROUP OF STUDENTS WHO ARE OF THE
SAME:
(I) RACE;
(II) ETHNICITY;
(III) GENDER;

HOUSE BILL 1636 3
(IV) DISABILITY STATUS, INCLUDING WHETHER THE STUDENT
HAS AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR SECTION 504 PLAN;
(V) SOCIOECONOMIC STATUS, AS DETERMINED BY ELIGIBILITY
FOR FREE OR REDUCED PRICE MEALS OR AN EQUIVALENT MEASURE;
(VI) GRADE LEVEL; OR
(VII) ENGLISH LANGUAGE PROFICIENCY.
(e) (1) On or before October 1 each year, the Department shall submit to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly, a student discipline data report that includes a description of the uses of
restorative practices in the State and a review of disciplinary practices and policies in the
State.
(2) The Department shall disaggregate the information in any student
discipline data report prepared by the Department by [race, ethnicity, gender, disability
status, eligibility for free or reduced price meals or an equivalent measure of socioeconomic
status, English language proficiency,] SUBGROUP and type of discipline for:
(i) The State;
(ii) Each local school system; [and]
(iii) Each public AND NONPUBLIC school, INCLUDING CHARTER
SCHOOLS;
(IV) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND;
(V) THE MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF;
(VI) THE SEED SCHOOL OF MARYLAND; AND
(VII) THE JUVENILE SERVICES EDUCATION PROGRAM.
(3) Special education–related data in any report prepared under this
subsection shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender.
(F) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “HIGH–SUSPENDING” INCLUDES:
(I) AN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL THAT SUSPENDS 10% OR MORE
OF ITS STUDENTS IN EACH SUBGROUP; AND

HOUSE BILL 1636
(II) A SECONDARY SCHOOL THAT SUSPENDS 25% OR MORE OF
ITS STUDENTS IN EACH SUBGROUP.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE PUBLIC IN A USABLE FORMAT ON
THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE ALL DISCIPLINE–RELATED DATA SEARCHABLE BY
THE STATE LEVEL, LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM LEVEL, AND SCHOOL LEVEL.
(3) THE DATA INCLUDED ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE:
(I) ANY DISCIPLINARY PRACTICES OF A SCHOOL OR
INSTITUTION LISTED IN SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION THAT ARE
DISPROPORTIONAL TO SIMILAR SCHOOLS WITH A SIMILAR COMPOSITION OF
SUBGROUPS;
(II) THE NUMBER AND PERCENTAGES OF STUDENTS
SUSPENDED;
(III) EACH SCHOOL OR INSTITUTION’S OVERALL SUSPENSION
RATE; AND
(IV) DATA ON HIGH–SUSPENDING SCHOOLS.
(G) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “RISK RATIO” MEANS THE RATIO OF STUDENTS IN A
SUBGROUP THAT ARE REMOVED FROM A SCHOOL TO ALL OTHER STUDENTS
ENROLLED AT THE SAME SCHOOL.
(III) “STATE COMPARISON THRESHOLD” MEANS A RATIO OF THE
REMOVAL RATE OF STUDENTS IN A SUBGROUP TO THE REMOVAL RATE:
1. OF ALL STUDENTS ENROLLED IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN
THE STATE; OR
2. ACROSS THE SAME SCHOOL LEVELS.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. MAINTAIN A RISK RATIO AND STATE COMPARISON
THRESHOLD OF 2.0;
2. USE THE RISK RATIO AND STATE COMPARISON

HOUSE BILL 1636 5
THRESHOLD TO IDENTIFY A SCHOOL’S DISCIPLINE PROCESS AS HAVING A
DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT ON STUDENTS IN A SUBGROUP; AND
3. PROVIDE SCHOOLS AND LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS
WITH SUPPORT AND RESOURCES TO REDUCE DISPARITIES IN DISCIPLINE TO BELOW
THE 2.0 RISK RATIO AND STATE COMPARISON THRESHOLD, AND REDUCE
EXCLUSIONARY DISCIPLINE OVERALL TO BELOW THE HIGH–SUSPENDING
THRESHOLD IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) IF THE DEPARTMENT IDENTIFIES A SCHOOL AS
HIGH–SUSPENDING OR HAVING A DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT, THE SCHOOL OR
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL SUBMIT A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN TO THE STATE
BOARD THAT DETAILS SPECIFIC ACTIONS THE SCHOOL OR LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM
WILL TAKE TO:
1. REDUCE THE HIGH–SUSPENDING OR
DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
DEPARTMENT IDENTIFIES THE SCHOOL AS HIGH–SUSPENDING OR HAVING A
DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT; AND
2. ELIMINATE THE HIGH–SUSPENDING OR
DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
DEPARTMENT IDENTIFIES THE SCHOOL AS HIGH–SUSPENDING OR HAVING A
DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT.
(III) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2028, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE THE
CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN AND INCLUDE:
1. THE LEVELS OF SUSPENSION FOR ANY SCHOOL
IDENTIFIED AS HIGH–SUSPENDING; AND
2. THE DISPROPORTIONALITY DATA FOR ANY SCHOOL
IDENTIFIED AS HAVING A DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT.
[(f)] (H) (1) In this subsection, “alternative school discipline practice” means
a discipline practice used in a public school that is not an in–school suspension or an
out–of–school suspension.
(2) The Department shall collect data on alternative school discipline
practices in public schools for each local school system, including:
(i) The types of alternative school discipline practices that are used
in a local school system; and

HOUSE BILL 1636
(ii) The type of misconduct for which an alternative discipline
practice is used.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.